Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5778.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 552. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), a person shall not do any of the following: (a) Enter the lands or premises of another without lawful authority after having been forbidden to do so by the owner or occupant or the agent of the owner or occupant. (b) Remain without lawful authority on the land or premises of another after being notified to depart by the owner or occupant or the agent of the owner or occupant. (c) Enter or remain without lawful authority on fenced or posted farm property of another person without the consent of the owner or his or her the owner's lessee or agent. A request to leave the premises is not a necessary element for a violation of this subdivision. This subdivision does not apply to a person who is in the process of attempting, by the most direct route, to contact the owner or his or her the owner's lessee or agent to request consent. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to a process server who is on the land or premises of another while in the process of attempting, by the most direct route, to serve process upon any of the following: (a) An owner or occupant of the land or premises. (b) An agent of the owner or occupant of the land or premises. (c) A lessee of the land or premises. (3) A Except as provided in subsection (4), a person who violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by a fine of not more than $250.00, or both. (4) A person who violates subsection (1) and who has previously been convicted of a violation of subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (5) (4) As used in this section, "process server" means a person authorized under the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.101 to 600.9947, or supreme court rule to serve process. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.